Utah statutes.
78A-4-201.   Appellate review of juvenile courts.

To uphold the clear and compelling fundamental liberty interests and constitutionally protected rights of parents and the strong public policy in favor of maximizing family unification, appropriate appellate review shall be made available and applied in furtherance of those interests.



Enacted by Chapter 281, 2012 General Session

